Maine, session 132, LD1879.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5200, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Imposition of tax to support agricultural programs. For tax years beginning on
or after January 1, 2026, an additional tax to support agricultural programs is imposed if
the income is $3,500,000 or more of each taxable corporation and on each group of
corporations that derives income from a unitary business carried on by 2 or more members
of an affiliated group subject to the tax imposed pursuant to subsection 1-A as follows.
A. In addition to the tax of 8.93% imposed pursuant to subsection 1-A on income in
excess of $3,500,000, a tax at the rate of 1.07% is imposed on the income in excess of
$3,500,000 for each taxable year of an entity subject to this subsection.
B. Revenue from the tax imposed pursuant to this subsection must be used to annually
fully fund the distribution of dairy stabilization support funds pursuant to Title 7,
section 3153-B.
C. Revenue in excess of that needed for the purpose of paragraph B must be distributed
annually in the following priority and amounts to the extent funds are available:
(1) To the Dirigo business incentives program created pursuant to section
5219-AAA, subsection 2, $5,000,000. Notwithstanding any provision of section
5219-AAA to the contrary, the Commissioner of Economic and Community
Development shall use funds received pursuant to this subparagraph to fund the
credit for expenditures on agricultural businesses;
(2) To fund the property tax exemption pursuant to chapter 919-B for agricultural
buildings constructed, reconstructed or renovated after January 1, 2026,
$1,000,000;
(3) To the Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest Products Investment Fund
established in Title 7, section 320-B, subsection 1, $5,000,000;
(4) To the Business Recovery and Resilience Fund program established in Public
Law 2023, chapter 643, Part UUUU, section 4, $2,000,000. The Commissioner of
Economic and Community Development shall work with the Commissioner of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to ensure that funds distributed pursuant to
this subparagraph are used to benefit the agriculture industry;
(5) To the Agricultural Marketing Loan Fund created in Title 10, section 1023-J
for the purposes specified in Title 7, section 435, $1,000,000; and
(6) To the Dairy Improvement Fund created in Title 10, section 1023-P for the
purposes specified in Title 7, section 2910-B, $1,000,000.
Any remaining balance must be transferred to the General Fund.
D. In the case of an affiliated group of corporations engaged in a unitary business with
activity taxable only by Maine, the rate provided in this subsection is applied only to
the amount of Maine net income of the entire group that exceeds $3,500,000 and must
be apportioned equally among the taxable corporations unless those taxable
corporations jointly elect a different apportionment.
In the case of an affiliated group of corporations engaged in a unitary business with
activity taxable both within and without this State, the rate provided in this subsection
Page 1 - 132LR2291(01)

413 is applied only to the amount of the net income of the entire group that exceeds
424 $3,500,000 and must be apportioned equally among the taxable corporations unless
435 those taxable corporations jointly elect a different apportionment.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA c. 919-B is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 919-B
AGRICULTURAL BUILDINGS EXEMPTION
§6911. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Agricultural building. "Agricultural building" means a structure located on
agricultural land and used for agricultural purposes that is constructed, reconstructed or
renovated after January 1, 2026.
2. Agricultural enterprise. "Agricultural enterprise" means knowledge, skill or labor
applied to growing or raising plants or animals, harvesting plants or growing or obtaining
plant or animal by-products. "Agricultural enterprise" includes forestry and aquaculture
and production, processing, storing, packaging or marketing products derived from the
activities described in this subsection.
3. Agricultural land. "Agricultural land" means land used by an agricultural
enterprise to support commercial farming production.
§6912. Property tax exemption for agricultural buildings
For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2026 but ending before April 1,
2036, an agricultural building is exempt from property taxes.
§6913. Reimbursement by State; audit; funding
1. Claims by municipalities. A municipality that provides an exemption from
property tax for an eligible person under this chapter may recover from the State 100% of
the amount of the property tax assessed on the agricultural building in the usual manner.
A municipality claiming reimbursement under this subsection shall submit a claim to the
bureau on the annual return required by section 383. The bureau shall review claims and
determine the total amount to be paid to each municipality. The bureau shall certify and the
Treasurer of State shall pay the amount due to each municipality by January 15th of the
year following the year for which the claim for reimbursement was submitted or within 60
days of the date the claim was filed, whichever is later.
2. Audits; determinations of bureau. The bureau may audit the records of a
municipality to ensure compliance with this chapter. The bureau may independently review
the records of a municipality to determine if claims under this section have been properly
approved. If the bureau determines that a claim was improperly approved, the bureau shall
ensure, either by setoff against other payments due the municipality or otherwise, that the
municipality is not reimbursed for that claim. A municipality that is aggrieved by a
determination of the bureau under this subsection may appeal pursuant to section 151.
Page 2 - 132LR2291(01)

3. Funding. To the extent funds are available pursuant to the distribution made
pursuant to section 5200, subsection 7, paragraph C, subparagraph (2), the exemption from
property tax under this chapter must be paid for using those distributed funds.